Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,294
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-8,294 to 81-8,301 shall be known and may be cited as the State Miscellaneous Claims Act.

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 44;

Laws 2007, LB339, § 2.